Hawaii statutes.
§465-15 Prohibited acts; penalties.
(a) No person shall:

(1) Use in connection with the person's name any
designation tending to imply that the person is a licensed psychologist unless
the person is duly licensed and authorized under this chapter;

(2) Represent oneself as a licensed psychologist
during the time the person's license issued under this chapter is suspended or
revoked;

(3) Advertise or make a representation, either
publicly or privately, as being a psychologist, licensed or otherwise, or as
being able to perform professional services described in section 465-1, except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, without having a valid unrevoked license
or temporary permit issued by the director; or

(4) Otherwise violate this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates this chapter shall
be fined not more than $1,000 for each violation of this chapter or imprisoned
not more than one year, or both. [L 1967, c 290, pt of §1; HRS §465-15; am L
1983, c 95, §7; am L 1985, c 115, §16; am L 1987, c 72, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next